th: รูปทรงของเสาปักเต็นท์: เดลต้า/หกเหลี่ยม; ตะปู/พิน; แผ่น; แกนกลม; สกรู; ตะขอเชพเพิร์ด; หิมะ/ทราย; รูปตัว V; คานรูปตัว Y; อื่นๆ
it: Forma del picchetto: Delta/esagonale; Chiodo/picchetto; Piatto; Asta tonda; Vite; A uncino; Neve/sabbia; A V; A Y; Altro
hr-HR: Oblik udjela: Delta / šesterokutni; Čavao/klin; Ploča; Okrugla šipka; Vijak; Pastirska kuka; Snijeg/pijesak; V-oblik; Y-profil; Ostalo
de: Form des Zeltpflocks: Delta/Sechseckig; Nagel/Stift; Platte; Rundstab; Schraube; Hirtenstab; Schnee/Sand; V-Form; Y-Profil; Sonstige
sv: Tältpåle – form: Delta/sexkant; Spik/pinne; Platta; Rund stång; Skruv; Herdekrok; Snö/sand; V-form; Y-balk; Övrigt
lt-LT: Kuoliuko forma: Deltos / šešiakampio; Vinies / smeigtuko; Plokštelės; Apvalaus strypo; Sraigto; Piemens kablio; Sniegui / smėliui; V formos; Y formos sijos; Kita
ko: 말뚝 모양: 델타/육각; 못/핀; 플레이트; 원형 로드; 나사형; 셰퍼드 훅; 눈/모래; V자형; Y-빔; 기타
sk-SK: Tvar kolíka: Trojhranný/šesťhranný; Klinec/kolík; Platňa; Okrúhla tyč; Skrutka; Pastiersky hák; Sneh/piesok; Tvar V; Profil Y; Iné
nl: Tentharing vorm: Delta/zeskantig; Spijker/pin; Plaat; Ronde staaf; Schroef; Herdershaak; Sneeuw/zand; V-vorm; Y-balk; Overige
ro-RO: Formă a țărușului: Delta/Hexagonal; Cui/Ac; Placă; Tijă rotundă; Șurub; Cârlig de păstor; Zăpadă/Nisip; În formă de V; Profil Y; Altele
fr: Forme du piquet: Delta/hexagonal; Clou/broche; Plaque; Tige ronde; Vis; Crochet en J; Neige/sable; En V; En Y; Autre
vi: Hình dạng cọc: Delta/Lục giác; Đinh/Ghim; Dạng tấm; Cọc tròn; Vặn ốc; Móc cong (Shepherd hook); Tuyết/cát; Hình chữ V; Hình chữ Y; Khác
cs: Tvar kolíku: Delta / šestihran; Hřebík/jehla; Destička; Kulatá tyč; Vrut; Pastýřská hůl (shepherd hook); Do sněhu / písku; Tvar V; Profil Y; Jiné
bg-BG: Форма на колчето: Делта/шестоъгълна; Пирон/щифт; Пластина; Кръгла пръчка; Винт; Овчарска кука; За сняг/пясък; V-образна; Y-образен профил; Друго
ja: 杭の形状: デルタ / 六角; ネイル / ピン; プレート; 丸棒; スクリュー; シェパードフック; スノー / サンド; V字; Y字; その他
el: Σχήμα πασάλου: Delta/εξάγωνο; Καρφί/Πείρος; Πλάκα; Στρογγυλή ράβδος; Βίδα; Γάντζος βοσκού; Χιονιού/Άμμου; Σχήμα V; Δοκός Υ; Άλλο
es: Forma de la estaca: Delta/hexagonal; Clavo/pasador; Placa; Varilla redonda; Tornillo; Gancho de pastor; Nieve/arena; Forma de V; Viga en Y; Otro
nb: Stakeform: Delta/sekskant; Spiker/plugg; Plate; Rund stang; Skrue; Gjeterkrok; Snø/sand; V-form; Y-profil; Annet
ru: Форма колышка: Дельтовидный/шестигранный; Гвоздь/шпилька; Пластина; Круглый стержень; Винтовой; Пастуший крюк; Для снега/песка; V-образный; Y-образный; Другой
pl: Kształt śledzia: Delta/sześciokątne; Gwóźdź/szpilka; Płaskie; Okrągły pręt; Śrubowe; Pastorał (Shepherd hook); Śnieżne/piaskowe; W kształcie litery V; W kształcie litery Y; Inne
zh-TW: 營釘形狀: 三角/六角; 釘狀/針狀; 板狀; 圓桿; 螺旋狀; 羊角狀; 雪地/沙地; V 型; Y 型; 其他
sl-SI: Oblika klina: Delta/šestkotna; Žebelj/zatič; Ploščata; Okrogla palica; Vijak; Pastirska palica; Za sneg/pesek; Oblika črke V; Y-profil; Drugo
en: Stake shape: Delta/hex; Nail/pin; Plate; Round rod; Screw; Shepherd hook; Snow/sand; V-shape; Y-beam; Other
fi: Telttakepin muoto: Delta/kuusio; Naula/tappi; Levy; Pyöreä tanko; Ruuvi; Paimenkoukku; Lumi/hiekka; V-muoto; Y-profiili; Muu
hu: Cövek formája: Delta/hatszög; Szög/csap; Lemeztalpas; Kerek rúd; Csavar; Kampós; Hó/homok; V-alakú; Y-alakú; Egyéb
da: Pløkform: Delta/sekskantet; Søm/pind; Plade; Rund stang; Skrue; Hyrdestav; Sne/sand; V-form; Y-profil; Andet
tr: Çadır kazığı şekli: Delta/altıgen; Çivi/pim; Plaka; Yuvarlak çubuk; Vida; Çoban kancası; Kar/kum; V şeklinde; Y kiriş; Diğer
pt-BR: Estaca formato: Delta/hexagonal; Prego/pino; Placa; Haste redonda; Parafuso; Gancho de pastor; Neve/areia; Formato em V; Feixe em Y; Outro
pt-PT: Forma da estaca: Delta/hexagonal; Prego/pino; Placa; Haste redonda; Parafuso; Gancho de pastor; Neve/areia; Forma de V; Perfil em Y; Outro
zh-CN: 地钉形状: 三角形/六边形; 钉形/针形; 板形; 圆杆; 螺纹形; 牧羊人钩; 雪地/沙地专用; V 形; Y 形梁; 其他